Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-2704
Designation; period valid; renewal.

A designation as Veteran and Active Duty Supportive under section 85-2703 shall be valid for a term of three years. A postsecondary institution may apply to the director to renew its designation through a process established by the department.

Laws 2019, LB486, § 4.